Utah statutes.
31A-22-1401.   Application.

(1)  The requirements of this part apply to individual policies and to group policies and certificates marketed in this state on or after July 1, 2001, other than employee and labor union group policies and certificates.

(2)  Entities subject to this part shall comply with other applicable insurance laws and rules unless they are in conflict with this part.

(3)  The laws, regulations, and rules designed and intended to apply to Medicare supplement insurance policies may not be applied to long-term care insurance.

(4)  Any policy or rider advertised, marketed, or offered as long-term care or nursing home insurance shall comply with the provisions of this part.

